North Dakota, session 69, SB2163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 43-07-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Any license issued under this chapter may be renewed for each successive contractor year by
obtaining from the registrar a certificate for the current contractor year. To obtain a certificate
for the current contractor year, the licensee shall file with the registrar an application that
includes a listing of each project, contract, or subcontract completed by the licensee during the
preceding calendar year in this state over the amount of twenty-five thousandfifty thousand
dollars and the nature of the work of each project, contract, or subcontract. The registrar,
within a reasonable time, shall forward a copy of the list to the state tax commissioner. The
applicant shall include with the application a copy of a certificate of liability insurance naming
the registrar as the certificate holder unless the registrar has a current valid certificate of
insurance on file, and a certification that the applicant has submitted all payroll taxes, including
North Dakota income tax, workforce safety and insurance premiums, and unemployment
insurance premiums due at the time of renewal, which documents need not be notarized.

S. B. NO. 2163 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2163.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 1 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State